Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 7. Sound Recordings.

Sec. 45.50.900.
Reproduction and sale of sound recordings without consent.

A person who (1) reproduces for sale, sells, offers for sale, or knowingly advertises for sale any sound recording that has been reproduced without the written consent of the owner or (2) advertises, offers for sale or resale, or sells or resells a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article on which sounds are recorded, without clearly and conspicuously disclosing on the outside cover, box, or jacket the actual name and full address of the manufacturer and the name of the actual performer or group, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by confiscation of the unlawful stock of the reproduced recording and by imprisonment for a period of not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both. In this subsection “owner” means the person who owns the original fixation of sounds embodied in the master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master film, or other device used for reproducing sounds on phonograph records, discs, tapes, films, or other articles upon which sound is recorded, and from which the transferred recorded sounds are directly derived.

The prohibition contained in (a) of this section is not applicable to the reproduction of a sound recording that

is used, or intended to be used, solely for broadcast by commercial or educational radio or television stations; or

constitutes the verbatim transcript, or other public record, of the proceedings of a judicial, legislative, or administrative agency, department, or other public body for which a charge or fee may or may not be made or collected for the reproduced recording.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 193 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.51.010 and 45.51.020.
Renumbered in 1980.